Arkansas, session 2025, SB421.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 15, Chapter 20, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:
Subchapter 15 — Arkansas Water, Waste Disposal, and Pollution Abatement
Facilities Financing Act of 2025

15-20-1501. Title.
This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Arkansas Water,
Waste Disposal, and Pollution Abatement Facilities Financing Act of 2025”.

15-20-1502. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Aquatic resources” means ecological functions, services,
and values provided by the waters of the United States that are subject to
compensatory mitigation under the United States Department of the Army
permits under § 404 of the Clean Water Act, 33 U.S.C. § 1344, and §§ 9 and 10
of the Rivers and Harbors Act, 33 U.S.C. §§ 401 and 403, or other federal law
requiring mitigation;
(2) “Bond biennium” means a two-year period beginning July 1 of
each odd-numbered year, beginning July 1, 2027;
(3) “Bonds” means bonds, notes, interim certificates, or other
evidences of indebtedness;
(4) “Debt service” means principal, interest, redemption
premiums, if any, trustee's fees, paying agent's fees, dissemination agent's
fees, and similar servicing fees relative to a bond;
(5) “Develop” means to plan, design, construct, acquire by
purchase, own, operate, rehabilitate, lease as lessor or lessee, enter into
lease-purchase agreements with respect to, lend, make grants in respect of,
or install or equip any lands, buildings, improvements, machinery, equipment,
or other properties of whatever nature, real, personal, or mixed;
(6) “Drainage” means the removal or diversion of water from
lands through natural or artificial means;
(7) “Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation” means the Federal
03/10/2025 6:34:15 PM JLL247

SB421
Deposit Insurance Corporation or its successor that insures commercial banks;
(8) “Flood control” means:
(A) Drainage, levee, and flood prevention improvements for
protection from water-induced damages;
(B) Adjustments in land use and facilities designed to
reduce flood damage from overflow or backwater due to major storms; and
(C) Facilities designed to collect, contain, or convey
water within natural watercourses or other waterways;
(9) “General revenues of the state” means the revenues described
and enumerated in § 19-6-201 of the Revenue Classification Law, § 19-6-101 et
seq., or in any successor law;
(10) “Irrigation” means the production or transportation of
water for agricultural uses through artificial or natural conveyances for
watering crops or other agricultural products;
(11) “Local entity” means:
(A) A nonprofit corporation;
(B) A county, municipality, conservation district,
improvement district, drainage district, irrigation district, levee district,
regional water distribution district, public facilities board, public water
authority, rural development authority, solid waste authority, regional
wastewater treatment district, regional solid waste management district,
rural water association, or school district in the state;
(C) An agency or instrumentality of any entity listed in
subdivision (11)(A) or subdivision (11)(B) of this section; or
(D) An agency or instrumentality of the state, including
without limitation the Arkansas Natural Resources Commission;
(12) “Nationally recognized rating agency” means Moody's
Investors Service, Inc., S & P Global, Fitch Ratings, or any other nationally
recognized rating agency approved by the State Investing Office;
(13) “Person” means a local entity or an individual,
corporation, trust, limited liability company, or partnership;
(14) “Pollution abatement” means the reduction, prevention,
recycling, control, or elimination by appropriate methods of contamination or
pollution, or other alteration of the physical, chemical, or biological
properties of land or waters of the state or of the discharge of a liquid,
gaseous, or solid substance as will or is likely to create a nuisance or
03/10/2025 6:34:15 PM JLL247

SB421
render any land or waters of the state harmful or detrimental or injurious to
public health, safety, or the welfare of individuals, to domestic,
commercial, industrial, agricultural, recreational, or other legitimate
beneficial uses, or to livestock, wild animals, birds, fish, or other aquatic
life;
(15) “Prior act” means Acts 2007, No. 631, as now or hereafter
amended;
(16) “Program” means the Water, Waste Disposal, and Pollution
Abatement Facilities Development Program of the commission under which the
commission will fund loans or grants to local entities or persons;
(17)(A) “Project” means any land, building, improvement,
machinery, equipment, or other property, real, personal, or mixed, or any
combination of land, buildings, improvements, machinery, equipment, or other
property, and programs using the property, developed in pursuance of the
purposes of this subchapter, including without limitation:
(i) The production, impoundment, treatment, and
transportation of water;
(ii) The collection, treatment, and disposition of
waste;
(iii) Pollution abatement programs;
(iv) Drainage or flood control facilities;
(v) Irrigation facilities; and
(vi) The preservation and development of wetlands
and aquatic resources.
(B) “Project” includes projects for:
(i) Agricultural, administrative, research,
residential, recreational, commercial, or industrial purposes;
(ii) The use and benefit of local entities, the
commission, and other persons; and
(iii) Facilities and improvements that are
necessary, ancillary, or related to a project;
(18) “Project costs” means all or any part of the administrative
costs of the commission in connection with the Water, Waste Disposal, and
Pollution Abatement Facilities Development Program and the costs of
developing any project, costs incidental or appropriate to the project,
including without limitation all costs to the commission associated with the
03/10/2025 6:34:15 PM JLL247

SB421
development or operation of any project in a supervisory capacity, and costs
incidental or appropriate to the financing of the project, including without
limitation capitalized interest, costs of issuance of and appropriate
reserves for the bonds, loan or commitment fees, loan or grant administration
fees, and costs for engineering, legal, and other administrative and
consultant services;
(19) “State Investing Office” means the Treasurer of State for
the investment of any funds established on the books of the State Treasury
and the commission for the investment of any funds held outside the State
Treasury;
(20) “Waste” means a liquid or solid produced as an undesirable
byproduct of any activity;
(21) “Water” means any waters of the state, including surface
water and groundwater; and
(22) “Wetlands” means land that:
(A) Has a predominance of hydric soils;
(B) Is inundated or saturated by surface water or
groundwater at a frequency and duration sufficient to support a prevalence of
hydrophytic vegetation typically adapted for life in saturated soil
conditions; and
(C) Under normal circumstances supports a prevalence of
the hydrophytic vegetation typically adapted for life in saturated soil
conditions.

15-20-1503. Authority to issue bonds.
(a)(1) The Arkansas Natural Resources Commission may issue bonds of
the State of Arkansas to be known as “State of Arkansas Water, Waste
Disposal, and Pollution Abatement Facilities general obligation bonds”, in
total principal amount not to exceed five hundred million dollars
($500,000,000), for the purposes of this subchapter.
(2) However, no more than one hundred sixty-five million dollars
($165,000,000) in total principal amount of bonds shall be issued to finance
projects for irrigation facilities.
(3) The bonds may be issued in one (1) or more series as
required under this subchapter.
(b) Unless the General Assembly authorizes a greater principal amount
03/10/2025 6:34:15 PM JLL247

SB421
to be issued during a bond biennium, the total principal amount of bonds to
be issued during any bond biennium shall not exceed sixty million dollars
($60,000,000).
(c)(1) Before any bonds may be issued during a bond biennium under
this subchapter, the commission shall submit to the Governor a written plan:
(A) Setting forth criteria to be used by the commission in
choosing the projects to be financed with the proceeds derived from the sale
of the bonds or the programs for which funds may be provided by the
commission to finance projects, or both; and
(B) Requesting authorization for the projected maximum
principal amount of bonds required to be issued in the bond biennium.
(2) Upon receipt of a written plan submitted under subdivision
(c)(1) of this section, the Governor shall:
(A) Confer with the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State
concerning whether the annual amount of general revenue funds required to be
set aside from the general revenues of the state under the Revenue
Stabilization Law, § 19-5-101 et seq., for payment of debt service
requirements in connection with the bonds during either year of the bond
biennium in which the bonds are to be issued would require moneys from the
general revenues of the state that would work undue hardship upon any agency
or program supported from the general revenues of the state under the Revenue
Stabilization Law, § 19-5-101 et seq.; and
(B) Upon compliance with subdivision (c)(2)(A) of this
section, obtain the advice of:
(i) The Joint Budget Committee if the General
Assembly is in session; or
(ii) The Legislative Council if the General Assembly
is not in session.
(d)(1) If the Governor deems it to be in the public interest, he or
she by proclamation shall authorize the commission to proceed with the
issuance of the bonds in one (1) or more series up to the maximum principal
amount for the bond biennium approved by the Governor.
(2)(A) If the Governor refuses to give his or her approval for
the issuance of the bonds by declining to issue a proclamation approving the
issuance, he or she shall promptly notify the commission in writing, and the
bonds shall not be issued.
03/10/2025 6:34:15 PM JLL247

SB421
(B) The commission may resubmit a request to the Governor
for the approval of the issuance of the bonds.
(C) The issue as resubmitted to the Governor shall be
dealt with in the same manner as provided in this section for the initial
request for authority to issue the bonds.

15-20-1504. Terms and characteristics of bonds.
(a) State of Arkansas Water, Waste Disposal, and Pollution Abatement
Facilities general obligation bonds issued under this subchapter shall be
issued in series in amounts sufficient to finance or refinance all or any
part of project costs with the respective series to be designated in
alphabetical order or by the year in which issued, or both.
(b)(1) Each series of bonds shall have the date as the Arkansas
Natural Resources Commission determines and shall mature or be subject to
mandatory sinking fund redemption as determined by the commission over a
period ending not later than thirty-five (35) years after the date of the
bonds of each series.
(2) Pending the issuance of bonds under this subchapter, the
commission may issue temporary notes maturing not more than five (5) years
from the date of issuance to be exchanged for or paid from the proceeds of
bonds when the bonds are issued.
(c)(1) Each series of bonds issued under this subchapter shall bear
interest whether or not subject to federal income taxation at the rate or
rates accepted by the commission.
(2) Interest shall be payable at the times determined by the
commission.
(d) The commission shall determine:
(1) The form of the bonds;
(2) The denomination of the bonds;
(3) Whether the bonds may be exchanged for bonds of another form
or denomination bearing the same rate of interest and date of maturity;
(4) Whether the bonds may be payable within or without the
state;
(5) Whether the bonds may be subject to redemption before
maturity, including:
(A) The manner of redemption; and
03/10/2025 6:34:15 PM JLL247

SB421
(B) The redemption prices; and
(6) Any other terms and conditions of the bonds.
(e) Bonds issued under this subchapter shall have all the qualities of
negotiable instruments or securities under the laws of the state, subject to
the provision for registration of ownership.

15-20-1505. Purpose of bonds.
(a) State of Arkansas Water, Waste Disposal, and Pollution Abatement
Facilities general obligation bonds issued under this subchapter shall be
issued to finance on a temporary or permanent basis or to refinance and
develop one (1) or more projects.
(b) The proceeds of bonds issued under this subchapter shall be
applied to:
(1) The payment of project costs and the costs and expenses of
issuance of the bonds or in connection with a project refinancing;
(2) The repayment of indebtedness incurred to pay project costs;
or
(3) For the refunding of bonds as provided in § 15-20-1513.

15-20-1506. Resolutions and trust indentures.
(a)(1) State of Arkansas Water, Waste Disposal, and Pollution
Abatement Facilities general obligation bonds issued under this subchapter
shall be authorized by resolution of the Arkansas Natural Resources
Commission.
(2) Each resolution authorizing bonds under this subchapter
shall contain the terms, covenants, and conditions deemed desirable for the
bonds, including without limitation conditions pertaining to:
(A) The establishment and maintenance of funds and
accounts;
(B) The deposit and investment of revenues and of bond
proceeds; and
(C) The rights and obligations of the state, its officers
and officials, the commission, and the registered owners of the bonds.
(3) A resolution of the commission to authorize bonds under this
section may provide for the execution and delivery by the commission of one
(1) or more trust indentures with one (1) or more banks or trust companies
03/10/2025 6:34:15 PM JLL247

SB421
located within or without the state, containing any of the terms, covenants,
and conditions stated in subdivision (a)(2) of this section.
(4) A trust indenture is binding upon the state and its
agencies, officers, and officials to the extent stated in this subchapter.
(b) A resolution or trust indenture adopted or executed under this
section shall provide that power is reserved to:
(1) Apply to the payment of debt service on the bonds issued or
secured under all or any part of the revenues that may be derived from a
project financed by the bonds or financed by the commission in some other
manner; and
(2) The extent of revenues that the commission elects to apply
to debt service, to release from any requirement of the resolution or trust
indenture other revenues and resources of the state, including without
limitation the general revenues of the state required to be transferred under
§ 15-20-1511.

15-20-1507. Form of bond — Signatures.
(a) Each State of Arkansas Water, Waste Disposal, and Pollution
Abatement Facilities general obligation bond issued under this subchapter
shall:
(1) Be signed with the manual or facsimile signatures of the
Governor, the Chair of the Arkansas Natural Resources Commission, and the
Treasurer of State; and
(2) Have affixed, imprinted, or lithographed on the bond the
Great Seal of the State of Arkansas.
(b) Any interest coupons attached to bonds issued under this
subchapter shall be signed with the facsimile signature of the Treasurer of
State.
(c) Delivery of the bonds and coupons executed under this subchapter
is valid notwithstanding any change in persons holding the offices occurring
after the bonds have been executed.

15-20-1508. Sale of bonds.
(a) State of Arkansas Water, Waste Disposal, and Pollution Abatement
Facilities general obligation bonds issued under this subchapter may be sold:
(1) Either at public or private sale in a manner and upon the
03/10/2025 6:34:15 PM JLL247

SB421
terms that the Arkansas Natural Resources Commission determines to be
reasonable and expedient for the purposes for which the commission was
created; and
(2) At the price the commission determines acceptable, including
sale at a discount.
(b) The commission may employ administrative agents, fiscal agents,
underwriters, architects, accountants, engineers, and legal counsel and may
pay any person employed by the commission reasonable compensation from the
proceeds of the bonds.
(c) The following may be paid from the proceeds of the bonds:
(1) Fees of any trustee or paying agent;
(2) The costs of publication of notices and of printing of the
bonds, official statements, and other documents relating to the sale of the
bonds;
(3) The fees of any rating agency; and
(4) Other reasonable costs of issuing and selling the bonds
incurred by the commission.

15-20-1509. Proceeds of bonds.
(a) The proceeds from the sale of State of Arkansas Water, Waste
Disposal, and Pollution Abatement Facilities general obligation bonds issued
under this subchapter together with all revenues derived by the Arkansas
Natural Resources Commission from any project financed or refinanced under
this subchapter that are appropriated, allocated, or otherwise set aside by
the commission for the payment of the bonds and from any other project that
are appropriated, allocated, or otherwise set aside by the commission for the
payment of the bonds, shall be deposited by the recipient of the proceeds, as
received, into trust funds either established in the State Treasury, or into
accounts established outside the State Treasury in the name of the
commission, to accomplish the purposes of this subchapter, in the amounts or
portions stated in the resolution or trust indenture authorizing or securing
the bonds issued to finance or refinance the development of projects.
(b)(1) There is established as a trust fund in the State Treasury an
account designated as the “Water, Waste Disposal, and Pollution Abatement
Facilities Financing Act of 2025 Bond Fund” that is created to provide for
payment of all or a part of the debt service in connection with bonds issued
03/10/2025 6:34:15 PM JLL247

SB421
under this subchapter.
(2)(A) The Treasurer of State shall establish separate accounts
and subaccounts within the Water, Waste Disposal, and Pollution Abatement
Facilities Financing Act of 2025 Bond Fund to correspond to the applicable
series of bonds.
(B) In addition, there may be created in the State
Treasury such other funds, accounts, or subaccounts as the commission may
determine to be necessary to accomplish the purposes of this subchapter.
(c)(1) All procedures and methods for the application of proceeds of
any series of bonds to the financing or refinancing of project costs shall be
stated in writing.
(2) Written procedures and methods under subdivision (c)(1) of
this section:
(A) Shall be maintained as a part of the records of the
commission; and
(B) May include without limitation:
(i) Development of projects to be owned, operated,
and maintained by the commission;
(ii) Grants to local entities and the commission;
(iii) Loans to local entities or persons or the
purchase of bonds or other general or special obligation debt of local
entities;
(iv) Development of projects to be leased to or
operated by local entities;
(v) Development of projects to be purchased at one
(1) time or by installment purchase by local entities;
(vi) Establishment of funds, including revolving
funds for the lending of money to persons to be repaid into the funds for the
development of projects;
(vii) Matching of proceeds of bonds with moneys
provided by a local entity or other persons;
(viii) Matching of moneys provided under other laws,
including § 15-22-501 et seq.; the Arkansas Water Resources Cost Share
Finance Act, § 15-22-801 et seq.; The Water, Sewer, and Solid Waste
Management Systems Finance Act of 1975, § 14-230-101 et seq.; § 15-22-1101 et
seq.; and § 15-5-901 et seq.;
03/10/2025 6:34:15 PM JLL247

SB421
(ix) Establishment of funds to refund or refinance
bonds issued under this subchapter, bonds issued under the prior act, and the
bonds or other debt of local entities that were incurred for the purpose of
paying project costs.
(d) Any arrangements undertaken under subsection (c) of this section
whereby a local entity will administer funds composed, in whole or in part,
of proceeds of bonds shall include a provision for the auditing no less than
annually of the funds.
(e) Proceeds from the sale of the bonds issued under this subchapter,
together with all revenues derived by the commission from any project
financed or refinanced under this subchapter or from any other project that
are appropriated, allocated, or otherwise set aside by the commission for the
payment of the bonds, may be invested and reinvested by the State Investing
Office in any of the following:
(1) Direct obligations of the United States, including
obligations issued or held in book-entry form on the books of the United
States Department of the Treasury or obligations that are unconditionally
guaranteed as to principal and interest by the United States;
(2) Bonds, debentures, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness
issued or guaranteed by any agencies of the United States Government that are
backed by the full faith and credit of the United States Government;
(3) Senior debt obligations issued or guaranteed by agencies of
the United States Government that are non-full faith and credit agencies;
(4) Money market funds investing exclusively in the investments
described in subdivision (e)(1), subdivision (e)(2), or subdivision (e)(3) of
this section;
(5) Certificates of deposit providing for deposits secured at
all times by collateral described in subdivision (e)(1), subdivision (e)(2),
or subdivision (e)(3) of this section if:
(A) The certificates of deposit are issued by commercial
banks whose deposits are insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation
and whose collateral is held by a third party; and
(B) The state investing office or its assigns have a
perfected first security interest in the collateral;
(6) Certificates of deposit, savings accounts, deposit accounts,
or money market deposits, all of which are fully insured by the Federal
03/10/2025 6:34:15 PM JLL247

SB421
Deposit Insurance Corporation;
(7) Bonds or notes issued by the state, a municipality, county,
school district, community college district, or regional solid waste
management district in the state, or an agency or instrumentality of the
state;
(8) Investment agreements with financial institutions or
insurance companies that are rated in one (1) of the two (2) highest rating
categories of a nationally recognized rating agency;
(9) Repurchase agreements providing for the transfer of
securities from a dealer bank or securities firm to the State Investing
Office and the transfer of cash from the State Investing Office to the dealer
bank or securities firm with an agreement that the dealer bank or securities
firm will repay the cash plus a yield to the State Investing Office in
exchange for the securities at a specified date if the repurchase agreements
satisfy the following criteria:
(A) Repurchase agreements must be between the State
Investing Office and a dealer bank or securities firm described as follows:
(i) Dealers with at least one hundred million
dollars ($100,000,000) in capital; or
(ii) Banks whose deposits are insured by the Federal
Deposit Insurance Corporation; and
(B) The written repurchase agreement contract shall
include the following:
(i) Securities that are acceptable for transfer are
those listed in subdivision (e)(1), subdivision (e)(2), or subdivision (e)(3)
of this section;
(ii) The term of the repurchase agreement may be up
to thirty (30) days;
(iii) The collateral shall be delivered to the State
Investing Office, the trustee if the trustee is not supplying the collateral,
or to a third party acting as agent for the trustee if the trustee is
supplying the collateral, before or at the time of the payment and perfection
by possession of certificated securities; and
(iv)(a) The securities must be valued weekly,
marked-to-market at current market price plus accrued interest.
(b) The value of collateral shall be equal to
03/10/2025 6:34:15 PM JLL247

SB421
one hundred three percent (103%) of the amount of cash transferred by the
State Investing Office to the dealer bank or security firm under the
repurchase agreement plus accrued interest.
(c) If the value of securities held as
collateral declines below one hundred three percent (103%) of the value of
the cash transferred by the State Investing Office, then additional cash,
acceptable securities, or a combination of cash and securities shall be
transferred and held by the State Investing Office; and
(10) Any other investment authorized by state law.

15-20-1510. Full faith and credit of state pledged to repay bonds.
State of Arkansas Water, Waste Disposal, and Pollution Abatement
Facilities general obligation bonds issued under this subchapter shall be:
(1) The direct general obligations of the state for the payment
of debt service on which the full faith and credit of the state are
irrevocably pledged so long as any such bonds are outstanding; and
(2) Payable from the general revenues of the state, and the
amount of general revenues of the state as is necessary is and shall remain
pledged to the payment of debt service on the bonds.

15-20-1511. Payment of debt service on the bonds.
(a)(1) On or before the commencement of each fiscal year, the Chief
Fiscal Officer of the State shall determine the estimated amount required for
payment of all or a part of the debt service on the State of Arkansas Water,
Waste Disposal, and Pollution Abatement Facilities general obligation bonds
issued under this subchapter during the fiscal year and deduct from the
estimated moneys to be available to the Arkansas Natural Resources Commission
from other sources to determine what amount of general revenues of the state
will be required.
(2) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall certify the
estimated amount determined under subdivision (a)(1) of this section to the
Treasurer of State.
(3) The Treasurer of State shall then make monthly transfers
from the State Apportionment Fund to the Water, Waste Disposal, and Pollution
Abatement Facilities Financing Act of 2025 Bond Fund of the amount of general
revenues of the state required to pay the maturing debt service on bonds
03/10/2025 6:34:15 PM JLL247

SB421
issued under this subchapter.
(b)(1) The obligation to make monthly transfers of general revenues of
the state from the State Apportionment Fund to the Water, Waste Disposal, and
Pollution Abatement Facilities Financing Act of 2025 Bond Fund shall
constitute a first charge against the general revenues of the state before
all other uses to which the general revenues of the state are devoted, either
under present law or under any laws that may be enacted in the future.
(2) However, to the extent other general obligation bonds of the
state have been issued or may subsequently be issued, all general obligation
bonds shall rank on a parity of security with respect to payment from general
revenues of the state.
(c) Moneys credited to the Water, Waste Disposal, and Pollution
Abatement Facilities Financing Act of 2025 Bond Fund shall be used only to
pay debt service on the bonds, either at maturity or upon redemption before
maturity, and for such purposes the Treasurer of State is designated
disbursing officer to administer such funds in accordance with this
subchapter.
(d) Moneys in the Water, Waste Disposal, and Pollution Abatement
Facilities Financing Act of 2025 Bond Fund over and above the amount
necessary to ensure the prompt payment of debt service on the bonds and the
establishment and maintenance of a reserve fund, if any, may be used for the
redemption of bonds before maturity under the provisions pertaining to
redemption before maturity, as stated in the resolution or trust indenture
authorizing or securing the bonds.

15-20-1512. Bonds exempt from state, county, and municipal taxes.
(a) State of Arkansas Water, Waste Disposal, and Pollution Abatement
Facilities general obligation bonds and the interest on the bonds issued
under this subchapter are exempt from state, county, and municipal taxes,
including income taxes, inheritance taxes, and property taxes.
(b) Bonds issued under this subchapter are eligible to secure deposits
of all public funds and are legal for investment of bank funds, fiduciary
funds, insurance company funds, trust funds, and public funds.

15-20-1513. Refunding bonds.
(a)(1) Bonds may be issued under this section to refund any
03/10/2025 6:34:15 PM JLL247

SB421
outstanding State of Arkansas Water, Waste Disposal, and Pollution Abatement
Facilities general obligation bonds issued under this subchapter or to refund
any outstanding bonds of the Arkansas Natural Resources Commission issued
under the prior act.
(2) Bonds issued under this section:
(A) Do not require the commission to submit a written plan
to the Governor under § 15-20-1503(c); and
(B) Are not subject to the requirements for the approval
and proclamation of the Governor under § 15-20-1503(d).
(b)(1) Refunding bonds issued under this section may be either sold
for cash or delivered in exchange for the outstanding obligations.
(2) If refunding bonds are sold for cash, the proceeds may be
applied to the payment of the obligations refunded or may be deposited in
irrevocable trust for the retirement of the outstanding obligations either at
maturity or on an authorized redemption date.
(c)(1) Refunding bonds issued under this section shall in all respects
be authorized, issued, and secured as provided for the bonds being refunded
and shall have all the attributes of the refunded bonds.
(2) To the extent that the refunding bonds are not in a greater
principal amount than the outstanding principal amount of the bonds being
refunded, the principal amount of the refunding bonds shall not be subject to
the limit of five hundred million dollars ($500,000,000) stated in § 15-20-
1503(a) or the limit of sixty million dollars ($60,000,000) stated in § 15-
20-1503(b).
(d) The resolution or trust indenture under which the refunding bonds
are issued under this section shall provide that any refunding bonds shall
have the same priority of payment as the obligations refunded.

15-20-1514. Additional powers of the Arkansas Natural Resources
Commission.
(a) In addition to powers conferred under other laws, the Arkansas
Natural Resources Commission may take appropriate action to carry out the
purposes of this subchapter, including the power to:
(1) Develop projects;
(2) Operate and maintain projects;
(3) Acquire absolute title to and use for any purpose and at any
03/10/2025 6:34:15 PM JLL247

SB421
place water stored in any reservoir or other impoundment;
(4) Acquire, collect, impound, store, transport, distribute,
sell, furnish, and dispose of water to any person at any place;
(5) Purify, treat, and process water;
(6) Assist local entities in the preparation of their premises
for the use of water furnished by the Arkansas Natural Resources Commission
and to construct upon their premises project properties of any kind and in
connection therewith to receive, acquire, endorse, pledge, hypothecate, and
dispose of notes, bonds, and other evidences of indebtedness;
(7) Use the bed of any watercourse without adversely affecting
existing riparian, highway, right-of-way, easement, or other similar property
rights, or any tax-forfeited land owned or held by the state or by any
political subdivision of the state;
(8) Provide loans and grants from bond proceeds or project
revenues to local entities and authorize local entities to make loans to
other persons for payment of project costs in order for the local entity
receiving the funds to develop a project;
(9) Purchase with bond proceeds or project revenues bonds or
notes from a local entity in order to provide funds for payment of project
costs in order for the local entity receiving the funds to develop a project
and to enter into note and bond purchase agreements in connection with the
project;
(10) Appropriate amounts from bond proceeds to satisfy state
matching requirements for federal grants, subsidies, and revolving loan funds
established by the United States Congress for the purpose of facilitating
water, waste disposal, pollution control, abatement and prevention, drainage,
irrigation, flood control, and wetlands and aquatic resources projects;
(11) Appropriate amounts from bond proceeds for the matching of
moneys provided under other laws, including without limitation, § 15-22-501
et seq., the Arkansas Water Resources Cost Share Finance Act, § 15-22-801 et
seq., The Water, Sewer, and Solid Waste Management Systems Finance Act of
1975, § 14-230-101 et seq., § 15-22-1101 et seq., and § 15-5-901 et seq.;
(12) Construct or cause to be constructed, lease as lessee,
lease as lessor, and in any manner acquire, own, hold, maintain, operate,
sell, dispose of, exchange, mortgage, or lend with respect to all or any part
of a project;
03/10/2025 6:34:15 PM JLL247

SB421
(13) Acquire, own, hold, use, exercise, sell, mortgage, pledge,
hypothecate, and in any manner dispose of franchises, rights, privileges,
licenses, rights-of-way, and easements necessary, useful, or appropriate for
the exercise of the powers or implementation of the purposes stated in this
subchapter;
(14) Sell and convey, mortgage, pledge, lease as lessor, enter
into lease-purchase agreements with respect to, and otherwise dispose of all
or any part of a project or other properties, tangible or intangible,
including without limitation franchises, rights, privileges, licenses,
rights-of-way, and easements;
(15) Make or accept gifts or grants of moneys, services,
franchises, rights, privileges, licenses, rights-of-way, easements, or other
property, real or personal or mixed;
(16) Make any contract necessary or convenient for the exercise
of the powers or implementation of the purposes of this subchapter;
(17) Fix, regulate, and collect rates, fees, rents, or other
charges for making any loan or commitment under this subchapter, for
performing accounting and loan servicing duties relating to the loans and for
the use of any properties or services furnished by the Arkansas Natural
Resources Commission, and with respect thereto, the Arkansas Natural
Resources Commission shall not be subject to the jurisdiction or control of
the Arkansas Public Service Commission;
(18) Require audits of all accounts related to construction,
operation, or maintenance of a project funded by this subchapter;
(19) Take reasonable actions necessary to ensure that debt
service requirements are met;
(20) Refinance loans made by the Arkansas Natural Resources
Commission from any source to local entities in order to develop a project;
(21) Provide loans from bond proceeds or project revenues to
local entities to refinance indebtedness of the local entity incurred to
develop a project;
(22) Procure insurance, letters of credit, or other credit
enhancement for the bonds;
(23) Administer the Water, Waste Disposal, and Pollution
Abatement Facilities Development Program;
(24) Purchase with bond proceeds or project revenues bonds or
03/10/2025 6:34:15 PM JLL247

SB421
notes from a local entity in order to provide funds to refinance indebtedness
incurred by a local entity to develop a project; and
(25) Take any other action appropriate to accomplish the
purposes of this subchapter.
(b) The Arkansas Natural Resources Commission may accomplish the
purposes of this subchapter through the delegation of any administrative
functions to the Department of Agriculture.

15-20-1515. No impairment of bond obligations.
(a) This subchapter constitutes a contract between the state and the
registered owners of all State of Arkansas Water, Waste Disposal, and
Pollution Abatement Facilities general obligation bonds issued under this
subchapter.
(b) The contract described in subsection (a) of this section shall
never be impaired, and any violation of the terms of the contract whether
under purported legislative authority or otherwise shall be enjoined by the
courts at the suit of any bondholder or any taxpayer.
(c) In a suit against the Arkansas Natural Resources Commission, the
Treasurer of State, or other appropriate agency, officer, or official of the
state, the courts shall prevent a diversion of any revenues pledged under
this subchapter and shall compel the restoration of diverted revenues by
injunction or mandamus.
(d) Without limiting any other appropriate remedy at law or in equity,
a bondholder may by an appropriate action, including without limitation
injunction or mandamus, compel the performance of all covenants and
obligations of the state and its officers and officials under this
subchapter.

15-20-1516. No obligations until bonds issued.
This subchapter does not create any right of any character unless the
first series of State of Arkansas Water, Waste Disposal, and Pollution
Abatement Facilities general obligation bonds authorized by this subchapter
has been sold and delivered.

15-20-1517. No impairment of outstanding bonds.
The issuance of State of Arkansas Water, Waste Disposal, and Pollution
03/10/2025 6:34:15 PM JLL247

SB421
Abatement Facilities general obligation bonds authorized under this
subchapter shall not impair or affect any outstanding bonds of the Arkansas
Natural Resources Commission issued under the prior act.

15-20-1518. Election.
(a)(1) State of Arkansas Water, Waste Disposal, and Pollution
Abatement Facilities general obligation bonds shall not be issued under this
subchapter except with the consent of a majority of the qualified electors of
the state voting on the question in substantially the form described in this
section at the 2026 general election unless the Governor by proclamation
calls a special election before the 2026 general election.
(2) If the question is presented at the 2026 general election,
notice of the question shall be published by the Secretary of State by one
(1) insertion in a newspaper of general circulation in the state at least
sixty (60) days before the general election, and notice of the question shall
be mailed to each county board of election commissioners and the sheriff of
each county at least sixty (60) days before the general election.
(3) If a special election is called by the Governor, the
proclamation of the special election shall be made at least sixty (60) days
before the date fixed by the proclamation for the election, and notice of the
special election shall be given by publication of the proclamation by one (1)
insertion in one (1) newspaper of general circulation published in each
county in the state not less than thirty (30) days before the date of the
special election.
(4) If there is no newspaper regularly published in a county,
the proclamation required under this subsection may be published in any
newspaper having a general circulation in the county.
(b) In the case of the notice or proclamation for the election under
this section, it is not necessary to publish this subchapter in its entirety,
but the notice or proclamation shall state that the notice or proclamation is
issued to submit to the people substantially the following question:
“Shall the Arkansas Natural Resources Commission be authorized to issue
general obligation bonds under the authority of the Arkansas Water, Waste
Disposal, and Pollution Abatement Facilities Financing Act of 2025, for the
financing and refinancing of the development of water, waste disposal, water
pollution control, abatement and prevention, drainage, irrigation, flood
03/10/2025 6:34:15 PM JLL247

SB421
control, and wetlands and aquatic resources projects to serve the citizens of
the State of Arkansas, in total principal amount not to exceed five hundred
million dollars ($500,000,000), with no more than one hundred sixty-five
million dollars ($165,000,000) in total principal amount of such bonds to be
issued to finance and refinance the development of irrigation facilities, in
series from time to time in principal amounts not to exceed, without prior
approval of the General Assembly, sixty million dollars ($60,000,000) in any
two-year period beginning on July 1 of each odd-numbered year, which bonds
shall be secured by a pledge of the full faith and credit of the State of
Arkansas?”
(c) Whether the question is presented at a special election or at the
2026 general election, the title of this subchapter shall be the ballot
title, and there shall be printed on the ballot the proposition as stated
above and the following:
“FOR Issuance of State of Arkansas Water, Waste Disposal, and Pollution
Abatement Facilities general obligation bonds _____
AGAINST Issuance of State of Arkansas Water, Waste Disposal, and
Pollution Abatement Facilities general obligation bonds _____”.
(d)(1) The county boards of election commissioners of the several
counties of the state shall hold and conduct the election required under this
section, and each board may take action with respect to the appointment of
election officials and other matters as the law requires.
(2) The vote shall be canvassed and the result declared in each
county by the county boards of election commissioners.
(3) Within ten (10) days after the date of the election held
under this section, the results shall be certified by the county boards of
election commissioners to the Secretary of State who shall tabulate all
returns received by him or her and certify to the Governor the total vote for
and against the proposition submitted under this section.
(e) The result of the election held under this section shall be
proclaimed by the Governor by publication one (1) time in a newspaper
published in the City of Little Rock, Arkansas, and the results as proclaimed
shall be conclusive unless attacked in the courts within thirty (30) days
after the date of the publication.

15-20-1519. Effect of election.
03/10/2025 6:34:15 PM JLL247

SB421
(a) If a majority of the qualified electors voting on the question
submitted under § 15-20-1518 vote for the issuance of State of Arkansas
Water, Waste Disposal, and Pollution Abatement Facilities general obligation
bonds, the Arkansas Natural Resources Commission shall proceed with the sale
and the issuance of the bonds as provided in this subchapter.
(b) If a majority of the qualified electors voting on the question
submitted under § 15-20-1518 vote against the issuance of the bonds, the
bonds authorized under this subchapter shall not be sold or issued, and this
subchapter shall be of no further effect.

15-20-1520. No waiver of previous authority to issue bonds.
This subchapter shall not constitute a waiver of the authority to issue
bonds under the prior act or any other legislation authorizing the issuance
of bonds for similar purposes.

15-20-1521. Severability.
If, for any reason, any section or provision of this subchapter is held
to be unconstitutional or invalid for any reason, the holding shall not
affect the remainder of this subchapter, but this subchapter, insofar as it
is not in conflict with the Arkansas Constitution or the United States
Constitution, shall be permitted to stand, and the various provisions of this
subchapter are declared to be severable for that purpose.

15-20-1522. Cases involving bonds.
(a) A case involving the validity of this subchapter or involving State
of Arkansas Water, Waste Disposal, and Pollution Abatement Facilities general
obligation bonds issued under this subchapter shall be deemed of public
interest and shall be advanced by all courts and heard as a preferred cause.
(b) An appeal from a judgment or decree rendered in a case described
under subsection (a) of this section shall be taken within thirty (30) days
after rendition of the judgment or decree.

15-20-1523. Construction of subchapter.
This subchapter:
(1) Shall be liberally construed to accomplish its purposes;
(2) Shall constitute the sole authority necessary to accomplish
03/10/2025 6:34:15 PM JLL247

SB421
the purposes of the subchapter, and to this end it is not necessary that the
provisions of other laws pertaining to the development of public facilities
and properties and the financing of public facilities and properties be
complied with;
(3) Shall be interpreted to supplement existing laws conferring
rights and powers upon the Arkansas Natural Resources Commission, and the
rights and powers stated in this subchapter shall be regarded as alternate
methods for the accomplishment of the purposes of this subchapter; and
(4) Does not repeal or reduce the powers conferred by the prior
act.


























03/10/2025 6:34:15 PM JLL247